Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1454
Settlement of claim or right.

A claim or right arising under the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act or under a rental agreement may be settled by agreement.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 5.